Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 72 O.S. 2021, Section 222, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 42, O.S.L. 2024 (72 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 222), is amended to read as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund an agency special account for the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs to be known as the "Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs Revolving Nonappropriated Veteran Care Enterprise Fund".
The revolving fund agency special account shall consist of all funds
and monies received by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs,
Req. No. 15897 Page 1

its constituent institutions, and/or or the Oklahoma Veterans
Commission, from any gifts, contributions, bequests, individual
reimbursements fees for service except as otherwise provided by law,
and other sources of revenue, for the care or support of war
veterans discharged other than under dishonorable conditions, who
have been admitted and cared for at the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs Centers Homes at Ardmore, Claremore, Clinton,
Lawton/Ft. Sill, Norman, Sulphur or Sallisaw. Provided, no grants-
in-aid, reimbursements, or other revenue from the United States
government or any instrumentality of the United States government,
or state appropriations shall be deposited in the fund. Provided
further, nothing contained herein prohibits the establishment and
utilization of special agency accounts by the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs and its constituent institutions, as may be
approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services, for receipt and disbursement of the personal funds of
Veteran Center Home patients and members residents and/or for
receipt and disbursement of charitable contributions and donations
for use by and for patients and members residents.
B. The revolving fund agency special account herein created
shall be used by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs to pay
for the care of war veterans discharged other than under
dishonorable conditions, in Veterans Centers Homes, to pay the
general operating expenses of the Veterans Centers Homes, including
Req. No. 15897 Page 2

the payment of salaries and wages of officials and employees, to pay
for the employee safety programs and incentive awards provided for
in Section 63.10a of this title, and to remodel, repair, construct,
build additions, modernize, or add improvements of domiciliary or
hospital buildings necessary for the care of veterans, including
tuberculosis, mentally ill or neuropsychiatric patients, but not
excluding others; and architectural plans, specifications, or other
costs pertinent thereto.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs may transfer
monies from the revolving fund created in this section to the W.V.C.
Revolving Fund in the State Treasury.
D. All expenditures from the revolving fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer based upon claims approved by
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, as provided by law, and
filed with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment agency special account are exempt
from the requirement of deposit in the State Treasury and from
disbursement through the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
D. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs shall:
1. Maintain accounting records for exempt funds on a basis
consistent with applicable federal requirements;
2. Submit quarterly informational reports to the Governor,
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro
Req. No. 15897 Page 3

Temp ore of the Oklahoma State Senate, and the Director of Office of
Management and Enterprise Services identifying sources, amounts,
purposes, and expenditures of such funds; and
3. Remain subject to examination by the State Auditor and
Inspector and to all federal audit and compliance requirements.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15897 MKS 01/08/26












Req. No. 15897 Page 4